Idaho statutes. Title 25 ANIMALS
Chapter 2 INSPECTION AND SUPPRESSION OF DISEASES AMONG LIVESTOCK
§ 25-229. Glanders — Tests

Destruction of affected animals. [Repealed.]

§ 25-230. Penalty for violation of regulations.

Any person, firm or corporation violating any of the provisions of this act shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction, shall be subject to a fine of not less than $100, nor more than $5000 for each offense.

History.

1919, ch. 35, § 34, p. 132; C.S., § 1876; I.C.A.,§ 24-230.

§ 25-231. Separability.

If any part or section of this chapter be decided by the courts to be unconstitutional or invalid, the same shall not affect the validity of the chapter as a whole, or any part thereof which can be given effect without the part so decided to be unconstitutional.

History.

1919, ch. 35, § 35, p. 132; C.S., § 1877; I.C.A.,§ 24-231.

§ 25-232. Disease and animal damage control tax levy and fees on cattle, horses, and mules.

There is hereby imposed upon cattle, horses, and mules in the state of Idaho a fee of twenty-two cents (22¢) per head. Said fee shall be collected at the time of every brand inspection when a charge for brand inspection is made as required by law. Such fee when collected shall be paid by the person paying the charge for brand inspection and shall be used by the Idaho department of agriculture for livestock disease control. The state brand inspector shall collect said fees in addition to, at the same time and in the same manner as the fee collected for brand inspection. The fees so collected shall be deposited as provided in section 25-233, Idaho Code.

In addition to the fee imposed in subsection (a) of this section, there is hereby imposed an additional fee not to exceed five cents (5¢) per head upon the same livestock subject to the fee required in subsection (a) of this section. The amount of the additional fee shall be fixed by order of the state brand board upon the written recommendation of the Idaho cattle association. The fees collected under the provisions of this subsection shall be deposited in the Idaho sheep and goat health account, and the board shall quarterly transmit the proper share of such moneys to the board of directors of each animal damage control district. The provisions of section 67-3525, Idaho Code, shall not apply to the payment of moneys from the Idaho sheep and goat health account to the animal damage control districts.

The state brand inspector shall be reimbursed for the reasonable and necessary expenses incurred for the collections required in this section, in an amount determined by the administrator of the division of animal industries, a representative of the Idaho cattle association and the inspector, but the total of such expense reimbursement for the fees collected as required in subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall not exceed one and one-quarter cents (1 ¼¢) per head.

History.

1943, ch. 139, § 8, p. 277; am. 1951, ch. 124, § 1, p. 292; am. 1955, ch. 46, § 1, p. 64; am. 1970, ch. 81, § 1, p. 200; am. 1974, ch. 18, § 125, p. 364; am. 1982, ch. 251, § 1, p. 642; am. 1985, ch. 37, § 1, p. 79; am. 1986, ch. 177, § 1, p. 467; am. 1989, ch. 5, § 1, p. 6; am. 1995, ch. 33, § 1, p. 51; am. 2012, ch. 117, § 24, p. 321; am. 2015, ch. 244, § 5, p. 1008.

§ 25-233. Livestock disease control and T.B. indemnity fund.

All moneys derived from this act shall be deposited with the state treasurer to the credit of the livestock disease control and T.B. indemnity fund, and shall be used for the purpose of payment of deputy veterinarians’ salaries, travel expense and cooperating with the United States department of agriculture, animal and plant health inspection service, veterinary services in maintaining laboratories, laboratory expense, equipment and supplies and for payment of indemnities for tubercular animals slaughtered, and for other purposes deemed advisable by the administrator of the division of animal industries providing that such expenditures shall further the betterment of the livestock industry in the state of Idaho.

History.

1943, ch. 139, § 9, p. 277; am. 1974, ch. 18, § 126, p. 364; am. 1993, ch. 16, § 18, p. 58.

§ 25-234. Feeding garbage to swine.

It shall be unlawful for any person to feed garbage to swine, or to deposit or receive such garbage on any premises where swine are kept, and no swine having fed on such garbage may be sold or removed from the premises.

Garbage as used in this section means putrescible animal or vegetable wastes containing animal parts, resulting from the handling, preparation, processing, cooking or consumption of food and which is collected from any source and includes animals or parts thereof as defined in section 25-3201, Idaho Code. The term shall not apply to private household wastes not removed from the premises where produced.

Any person, firm, partnership or corporation violating the provisions of this act shall, upon conviction thereof, be guilty of a misdemeanor. Each day the provisions of this act are violated shall constitute a separate offense.

History.

I.C.,§ 25-234, as added by 1973, ch. 39, § 3, p. 73.

§ 25-235. Enforcement.

The department of agriculture, division of animal industries of the state of Idaho, is hereby charged with the enforcement of this act, and is empowered, in conformity with the provisions of the administrative procedures act, to promulgate and adopt such reasonable rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry into effect the full intent and meaning of this act.

History.

I.C.,§ 25-235, as added by 1973, ch. 39, § 4, p. 73; am. 1974, ch. 18, § 127, p. 364.

§ 25-236. Possession, sale, trade, barter, exchange and importation of animals.

No person shall possess, offer for sale, trade, barter, exchange or importation into the state of Idaho any fox, skunk or raccoon, except as provided in subsection (2) or (3) of this section.

Fur farms may possess or import any domestic fur-bearing animals with a certificate of veterinary inspection and domestic fur-bearing animals may be sold, traded, bartered or exchanged between fur farms in Idaho.

Public parks, zoos, museums, and educational institutions may possess or import the animals listed in subsection (1) of this section only if the entity possesses a permit from the department of agriculture and the imported animal is accompanied by a certificate of veterinary inspection. The department of agriculture may refuse to issue a permit if the department finds that the entity requesting the permit does not have physical facilities adequate to maintain the animal in health and safety and to prevent the escape of the animal from confinement. Public parks, zoos, museums, and educational institutions that possess a permit from the department of agriculture may sell, trade, barter or exchange any of the animals listed in subsection (1) of this section with any other entity that has a valid permit from the department of agriculture.

History.

I.C.,§ 25-236, as added by 1981, ch. 217, § 1, p. 405; am. 1993, ch. 16, § 19, p. 58; am. 2006, ch. 226, § 1, p. 677.

§ 25-237. Disposal of dead animal bodies, carcasses and body parts.

The administrator of the division is authorized to regulate the disposal of dead animal bodies, carcasses and body parts, and similar activities to protect public health, animals and the environment. The administrator is authorized to promulgate and enforce rules that may be necessary for the efficient administration and enforcement of this section. Such rules shall be consistent with other applicable state or federal laws or rules or regulations which relate to disposal of dead animal bodies, carcasses and body parts.

Any person violating this section or rules promulgated under this section is guilty of a misdemeanor. Upon conviction, violators are subject to a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) and not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each offense, or by imprisonment in the county jail for a period not to exceed six (6) months.

Any person violating this section or rules promulgated under this section may be assessed a civil penalty by the department or its agent of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each offense. Persons against whom civil penalties are assessed are liable for reasonable attorney’s fees. Civil penalties may be assessed in conjunction with any other department administrative action. Civil penalties may not be assessed unless the person charged has been given notice and opportunity for a hearing pursuant to the Idaho administrative procedure act, chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code. If the department is unable to collect an assessed civil penalty or if any person fails to pay all or a set portion of a civil penalty as determined by the department, the department may recover such amount by action in the appropriate district court. Any person against whom the department has assessed a civil penalty under this section may, within twenty-eight (28) days of the final agency action making the assessment, seek judicial review of the assessment in accordance with the provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code. Moneys collected for violations of this section or rules promulgated under this section shall be deposited in the state treasury and credited to the livestock disease control and T.B. indemnity fund. If the director determines that a person has not complied with this section or the rules promulgated under this section, the director shall identify appropriate corrective actions. The director may develop a formal compliance schedule to correct deficiencies caused by noncompliance. The director may, through a formal compliance schedule, allow all or part of the value of the assessed civil penalties to apply toward correction of the deficiencies.

Nothing in this section requires the director to report minor violations for prosecution when he believes that the public interest will be best served by suitable warnings or other administrative action.

History.

I.C.,§ 25-237, as added by 2000, ch. 259, § 1, p. 730.

§ 25-238. Civil penalties.

Any person, firm or corporation violating the provisions of this chapter or rules promulgated under this chapter may be assessed a civil penalty by the department or its agent of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each offense. Persons, firms or corporations against whom civil penalties are assessed are liable for reasonable attorney’s fees. Civil penalties may be assessed in conjunction with any other department administrative action. Civil penalties may not be assessed unless the person, firm or corporation charged has been given notice and an opportunity for a hearing pursuant to the provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code. If the department is unable to collect an assessed civil penalty or if any person, firm or corporation fails to pay all or a set portion of a civil penalty as determined by the department, the department may recover such amount by action in the appropriate district court. Any person, firm or corporation against whom the department has assessed a civil penalty under this chapter may, within twenty-eight (28) days of the final agency action making the assessment, seek judicial review of the assessment in accordance with the provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code. Moneys collected for violations of this chapter, or rules promulgated under this chapter, shall be deposited in the state treasury and credited to the livestock disease control and T.B. indemnity fund. If the director determines that a person, firm or corporation has not complied with this chapter, or the rules promulgated under this chapter, the director shall identify appropriate corrective actions. The director may develop a formal compliance schedule to correct deficiencies caused by noncompliance. The director may, through a formal compliance schedule, allow all or part of the value of the assessed civil penalties to apply toward correction of the deficiencies.

Nothing in this section requires the director to report minor violations for prosecution when he believes that the public interest will be best served by suitable warnings or other administrative action.

History.

I.C.,§ 25-238, as added by 2005, ch. 44, § 1, p. 172.

§ 25-239. Definitions.

When used in this chapter or in rules promulgated under this chapter:

“Administrator” means the administrator of the division of animal industries, Idaho state department of agriculture, or his designee.

“Approved feedlot” means a livestock feedlot, inspected and approved by the department, for finish feeding cattle or bison of unknown disease, test or vaccination status.

“Approved trader lot” means a livestock facility operated by a livestock dealer licensed by the Idaho state brand board where cattle of unknown disease status are received and then sold and transported to other destinations. All approved trader lots must be inspected and approved by the department.

“Buying station” means a livestock facility where cattle are gathered to be shipped directly to slaughter within seven (7) days of arrival at the buying station. All buying stations must be inspected and approved by the department.

“Department” means the Idaho state department of agriculture.

“Livestock dealer” means any person who buys livestock and offers them for resale within twenty (20) days from the date of purchase. All livestock dealers are required to be licensed by the Idaho state brand board.

“Livestock market” means any facility where livestock are sold, received or shipped for profit. Anyone operating as a public livestock market must first secure a charter from the department. To maintain a charter, a public livestock market must conduct a minimum of one (1) sale per calendar year.

History.

I.C.,§ 25-239, as added by 2016, ch. 49, § 1, p. 143.

§ 25-240. Livestock removal requirements.

Livestock removal requirements shall apply as follows:

For approved feedlots, all animals must go to slaughter except under conditions specified in rule by the department.

For approved trader lots, brucellosis test-eligible cattle that are sexually intact cattle over eighteen (18) months or pregnant or post-pregnant cattle of any age, must receive a health certificate prior to release for breeding or grazing purposes. Cattle destined for slaughter, an approved feedlot or a livestock market are exempt from this requirement. Cattle that are not brucellosis test-eligible are not required to receive a health certificate prior to release. All non-virgin bulls and all bulls over eighteen (18) months of age leaving a trader lot must be accompanied with a current negative trichomoniasis test or undergo three (3) negative trichomoniasis tests collected at least seven (7) days apart unless they are destined for slaughter, an approved feedlot or a livestock market.

For buying stations, no health certificate or saleyard release is required because all buying station livestock must go directly to slaughter and cattle going to slaughter do not require a health certificate.

For livestock dealers, if cattle are sold and are moving within the state, the only removal requirement is to receive a brand inspection. No health certificate is required. If cattle are crossing state lines, all livestock interstate movement requirements shall apply, which in most instances will include a health certificate.

For livestock markets, all animals shall be inspected by an accredited veterinarian, confirmed to be free of disease and receive either a saleyard release form or health certificate to certify the livestock meet all requirements to ship to their destinations.

History.

I.C.,§ 25-240, as added by 2016, ch. 49, § 2, p. 143.

§ 25-241. Penalties. [Repealed.]